Washington statutes.
RCW 37.04.050

Concurrent jurisdiction—Governor authorized to accept—Procedures.

(1) Upon the filing of a legally adequate notice with the governor by the secretary or administrator of any agency of the United States of America owning or having exclusive jurisdiction over certain property, the governor is authorized and directed to accept such jurisdiction as is necessary to establish concurrent jurisdiction between the United States and the state of Washington over the property as described in such notice and to the extent and periods of time authorized in such notice. The acquisition of such concurrent jurisdiction shall become effective upon filing the documents signifying such acceptance in the office of the secretary of state of the state of Washington.

(2) The authorization contained in subsection (1) of this section shall not be exclusive, shall not affect any existing jurisdiction or concurrent jurisdiction by the state over federal property, and shall be in addition to any other method or methods of assuming jurisdiction or concurrent jurisdiction over federal property.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 49 s 1.]